Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB665.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 53 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a chapter to read:CHAPTER 62SAFE EXCHANGE ZONE PROGRAMSec.6201. Scope of chapter.6202. Definitions.6203. Legislative purpose.6204. Safe Exchange Zone Program.§ 6201. Scope of chapter.This chapter relates to the Safe Exchange Zone Program.1234567891011121314151617 § 6202. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"County." A county of any class."Department." The Department of Community and Economic Development of the Commonwealth."Municipality." A county, city, borough, incorporated town, township or home rule, optional plan or optional charter municipality or municipal authority in this Commonwealth and any entity formed under Subchapter A of Chapter 23 (relating to intergovernmental cooperation)."Participant." An individual utilizing a safe exchange zone."Participating entity." A local police department, a county sheriff or the Pennsylvania State Police."Program." The Safe Exchange Zone Program established under section 6204(a) (relating to Safe Exchange Zone Program)."Safe exchange zone." A place that meets the requirements under section 6204(e)(1)(iii).§ 6203. Legislative purpose.The purpose of this chapter is to establish safe public locations for participants to exchange goods purchased online and for child custody exchanges through the distribution of grant money t o municipalities. § 6204. Safe Exchange Zone Program.(a) Establishment.--The Safe Exchange Zone Program is established within the department.(b) Eligibility.--Municipalities may apply for a one-time grant under the program to establish safe exchange zones at a participating entity's office or barracks or in a public area.20250SB0665PN0688 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (c) Application.--The department shall generate an application upon which municipalities may apply for a grant under the program. The form shall indicate the cost of establishing a safe exchange zone, the location, the approval of a participating entity to assist with the safe exchange zone , the approval from another municipality, if applicable, and any additional information the department deems necessary.(d) Duty of department.--The department shall approve or deny an application under subsection (b) within 30 days of receipt of the application. Upon approval of an application, the department shall disburse the grant money as provided under subsection (h).(e) Safe exchange zone requirements and assignment of responsibility.--(1) Safe exchange zones:(i) Shall have an appropriate video surveillance system to observe all areas of the safe exchange zone.(ii) Shall be clearly indicated with proper signage that displays the participating entity's telephone number and "in case of an emergency dial 911."(iii) May only be placed:(A) within 100 feet of a local police department's office;(B) within 100 feet of a county sheriff's office;(C) within 100 feet of a State Trooper barracks; or(D) within 100 feet of a public park, county courthouse, local magistrate's office, municipal office or other public area that has an active public 20250SB0665PN0688 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 presence, as approved by the department.(iv) Must be on public land under the jurisdiction or ownership of the applicant municipality unless otherwise approved by the governing body of ownership of the public land.(2) If the municipality seeks to establish a safe exchange zone under paragraph (1)(iii)(A), the participating entity shall be the local police department.(3) If the municipality seeks to establish a safe exchange zone under paragraph (1)(iii)(B), the participating entity shall be the county sheriff.(4) If the municipality seeks to establish a safe exchange zone under paragraph (1)(iii)(C), the participating entity shall be the Pennsylvania State Police.(5) If the municipality seeks to establish a safe exchange zone under paragraph (1)(iii)(D), the video surveillance requirement under subsection (g) shall be the responsibility of the participating entity that has agreed to assist with the safe exchange zone. (f) Participating entity requirements.--A participating entity:(1) Shall adequately monitor the video surveillance system required under subsection (e)(1)(i) for activity that endangers participants or the public in accordance with subsection (g) . (2) Must ensure that participants have the ability to notify the participating entity of the need for assistance by displaying the appropriate contact information as required under subsection (e)(1)(ii).(3) If a participant notifies a participating entity 20250SB0665PN0688 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 under paragraph (2), shall properly assist the participant in accordance with the guidelines established under subsection (g) and ensure that the exchange does not present a danger to the participant or the public.(4) During examination of the video surveillance, may not interfere with an exchange unless it presents a clear and present danger to the participating entity, a participant or the public or unless the participating entity's assistance is requested by a participant under paragraph (2).(g) Guidelines and procedures.--In consultation with participating entities, the department shall establish guidelines and procedures for the adequate monitoring and retention of video surveillance required under subsection (f)(1) and for surveillance measures necessary to keep participants and the public safe. The guidelines and procedures may not infringe on the rights of the participants of the exchange enumerated in the Fourth Amendment of the Constitution of the United States.(h) Priority of award.--Priority shall be given to municipalities awarded a grant under this section in the following order:(1) Municipalities seeking to establish safe exchange zones within 100 feet of a local police department, county sheriff's office or State Trooper barrack.(2) Municipalities seeking to establish safe exchange zones in a public area under the jurisdiction or ownership of the applicant municipality unless otherwise approved by the governing body of ownership of the public land.(i) Disbursement of money.--The Secretary of Community and Economic Development shall ensure that the grant money awarded under this section is geographically disbursed throughout this 20250SB0665PN0688 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Commonwealth.(j) Use and audit.--Grant money must be used exclusively for the purpose of establishing a safe exchange zone and is subject to audit by the department and the Auditor General.(k) Liability limited.--The following entities may not be held liable or in breach or violation of any law or standard for the conduct of participants in a safe exchange zone established under this chapter:(1) The municipality that established the safe exchange zone.(2) The participating entity assigned responsibility for the safe exchange zone under subsection (e)(2), (3), (4) or (5).(3) The department.(4) The county in which the municipality that established the safe exchange zone is located.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 180 days.20250SB0665PN0688 - 6 - 1234567891011121314151617